Illinois, session 104th, SB4099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 7Financial Institution Fund to the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services.............................3,816,80010  For State Contributions to the State11   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,652,10012  For State Contributions to Social Security..........300,90013  For Group Insurance...............................1,073,60014  For Contractual Services............................519,80015  For Travel..........................................111,20016  For Electronic Data Processing......................188,60017  For Telecommunication Services.......................59,70018  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................10,80019  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses20   of the Department................................3,249,00021  For Refunds..........................................17,50022    Total                                         $11,000,000   SB4099- 2 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 3Credit Union Fund to the Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation:5CREDIT UNION6  For Personal Services.............................3,150,2007  For State Contributions to State8   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,367,9009  For State Contributions to Social Security..........245,40010  For Group Insurance...............................1,053,70011  For Contractual Services............................211,00012  For Travel..........................................175,30013  For Electronic Data Processing......................157,80014  For Telecommunication Services.......................23,60015  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................4,60016  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses17   of the Department..................................374,00018  For Refunds...........................................3,00019    Total                                          $6,766,500 20    Section 10. The sum of $13,655,800, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation 22Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 23Regulation for costs associated with operational expenses of 24the department in relation to the regulation of adult-use 25cannabis.   SB4099- 3 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1    Section 15. The sum of $5,974,200, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation 3Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 4Regulation for administration by the Cannabis Regulation 5Oversight Officer for costs as authorized by Section 5-45 of 6the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 7    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 9purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the Bank and 10Trust Company Fund to the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation:12DOMESTIC AND FOREIGN COMMERCIAL BANK REGULATION13  For Personal Services............................12,478,80014  For State Contribution to State15   Employees' Retirement System.....................5,494,10016  For State Contributions to Social Security..........958,40017  For Group Insurance...............................4,118,40018  For Contractual Services............................910,50019  For Travel..........................................820,80020  For Electronic Data Processing......................742,70021  For Telecommunication Services......................115,80022  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................20,80023  For Refunds..........................................25,00024  For Operational Expenses of the  SB4099- 4 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1   Division of Banking................................803,8002  For Corporate Fiduciary Receivership................249,1003    Total                                         $26,738,200 4    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 6purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the 7Pawnbroker Regulation Fund to the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation:9PAWNBROKER REGULATION10  For Personal Services...............................233,30011  For State Contributions to State Employees' 12   Retirement System..................................101,30013  For State Contributions to Social Security...........17,90014  For Group Insurance..................................70,40015  For Contractual Services.............................14,60016  For Travel............................................8,00017  For Electronic Data Processing.......................11,90018  For Telecommunication Services........................2,10019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................40020  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses21   of the Department...................................12,10022  For Refunds...........................................2,00023    Total                                            $474,000 24    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much   SB4099- 5 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 2from the Residential Finance Regulatory Fund to the Department 3of Financial and Professional Regulation:4MORTGAGE BANKING AND THRIFT REGULATION5  For Personal Services.............................3,110,0006  For State Contributions to State7   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,350,5008  For State Contributions to Social Security..........237,9009  For Group Insurance.................................971,00010  For Contractual Services..........................1,250,60011  For Travel..........................................140,50012  For Electronic Data Processing......................144,60013  For Telecommunication Services.......................46,20014  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................8,30015  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses16   of the Department..................................960,50017  For Refunds...........................................5,00018    Total                                          $8,225,100 19    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 21from the Savings Bank Regulatory Fund to the Department of 22Financial and Professional Regulation:23SAVINGS BANK REGULATION24  For Personal Services...............................279,00025  For State Contributions to State  SB4099- 6 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1   Employees' Retirement System.......................121,3002  For State Contributions to Social Security...........21,4003  For Group Insurance.................................105,6004  For Contractual Services.............................29,7005  For Travel...........................................42,9006  For Electronic Data Processing.......................37,5007  For Telecommunication Services........................6,0008  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,2009  For Savings Bank Regulation..........................40,30010    Total                                            $684,900 11    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 13from the Real Estate License Administration Fund to the 14Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:15REAL ESTATE LICENSING AND ENFORCEMENT16  For Personal Services.............................3,721,00017  For State Contributions to State18   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,596,40019  For State Contributions to Social Security..........288,60020  For Group Insurance...............................1,232,00021  For Contractual Services............................318,30022  For Travel...........................................86,70023  For Electronic Data Processing......................297,10024  For Telecommunication Services.......................42,30025  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................7,600  SB4099- 7 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses2   of the Department..................................270,6003  For Refunds..........................................10,0004    Total                                          $7,870,600 5    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 7from the Appraisal Administration Fund to the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation:9APPRAISAL LICENSING10  For Personal Services...............................329,90011  For State Contributions to State12   Employees' Retirement System.......................143,40013  For State Contributions to Social Security...........25,30014  For Group Insurance.................................105,60015  For Contractual Services.............................78,70016  For Travel............................................6,40017  For Electronic Data Processing.......................59,00018  For Telecommunication Services.......................10,40019  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,00020  For forwarding real estate appraisal fees21   to the federal government..........................630,00022  For Refunds..........................................50,00023    Total                                          $1,440,700 24    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much   SB4099- 8 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 2from the General Professions Dedicated Fund to the Department 3of Financial and Professional Regulation:4GENERAL PROFESSIONS5  For Personal Services.............................5,558,5006  For State Contributions to State7   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,410,3008  For State Contributions to Social Security..........430,9009  For Group Insurance...............................2,094,40010  For Contractual Services............................843,10011  For Travel...........................................32,60012  For Electronic Data Processing......................374,50013  For Telecommunication Services......................119,60014  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................21,50015  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses16   of the Department..................................776,20017  For Refunds..........................................60,00018    Total                                         $12,721,600 19    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 21from the Illinois State Dental Disciplinary Fund to the 22Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:23  For Personal Services...............................824,00024  For State Contributions to State25   Employees' Retirement System.......................353,000  SB4099- 9 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For State Contributions to Social Security...........77,2002  For Group Insurance.................................316,8003  For Contractual Services............................162,4004  For Travel............................................2,2005  For Electronic Data Processing.......................88,8006  For Telecommunication Services.......................13,5007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,6008  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses9   of the Department..................................590,80010  For Refunds..........................................10,00011    Total                                          $2,441,300 12    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 14from the Illinois State Medical Disciplinary Fund to the 15Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:16  For Personal Services.............................6,837,00017  For State Contributions to State18   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,974,60019  For State Contributions to Social Security..........521,30020  For Group Insurance...............................2,604,80021  For Contractual Services..........................1,225,30022  For Travel..........................................147,50023  For Electronic Data Processing......................517,20024  For Telecommunication Services.......................80,10025  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................14,400  SB4099- 10 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses2   of the Department................................2,505,7003  For Refunds..........................................50,0004    Total                                         $17,477,900 5    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 7from the Optometric Licensing and Disciplinary Board Fund to 8the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services...............................430,90010  For State Contributions to State11   Employees' Retirement System.......................171,90012  For State Contributions to Social Security...........37,70013  For Group Insurance.................................140,80014  For Contractual Services.............................30,60015  For Travel..............................................30016  For Electronic Data Processing.......................14,50017  For Telecommunication Services........................2,40018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................60019  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses20   of the Department..................................149,40021  For Refunds..........................................10,00022    Total                                            $989,100 23    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated   SB4099- 11 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1from the Design Professionals Administration and Investigation 2Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 3Regulation:4  For Personal Services...............................808,2005  For State Contributions to State6   Employees' Retirement System.......................322,1007  For State Contributions to Social Security..........124,2008  For Group Insurance.................................342,5009  For Contractual Services............................113,00010  For Travel............................................3,90011  For Electronic Data Processing.......................92,50012  For Telecommunication Services.......................14,10013  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,70014  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses15   of the Department..................................113,90016  For Refunds..........................................10,00017    Total                                          $1,947,100 18    Section 80. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 20from the Illinois State Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund to the 21Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:22  For Personal Services.............................1,801,80023  For State Contributions to State24   Employees' Retirement System.......................768,90025  For State Contributions to Social Security..........136,700  SB4099- 12 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For Group Insurance.................................492,8002  For Contractual Services............................285,7003  For Travel...........................................17,9004  For Electronic Data Processing......................183,4005  For Telecommunication Services.......................28,6006  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................5,1007  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses8   of the Department..................................188,9009  For Refunds..........................................10,00010    Total                                          $3,919,800 11    Section 85. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 13from the Illinois State Podiatric Disciplinary Fund to the 14Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:15  For Personal Services................................80,80016  For State Contributions to State17   Employees' Retirement System........................35,10018  For State Contributions to Social Security............6,20019  For Group Insurance..................................35,20020  For Contractual Services..............................9,50021  For Travel..............................................40022  For Electronic Data Processing........................7,30023  For Telecommunication Services........................1,20024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................40025  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses  SB4099- 13 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1   of the Department...................................68,0002  For Refunds..........................................30,0003    Total                                            $274,100 4    Section 90. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 6from the Registered Certified Public Accountants' 7Administration and Disciplinary Fund to the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation:9  For Personal Services.............................1,096,00010  For State Contributions to State11   Employees' Retirement System.......................488,60012  For State Contributions to Social Security...........82,90013  For Group Insurance.................................316,80014  For Contractual Services.............................36,80015  For Travel............................................1,10016  For Electronic Data Processing.......................32,80017  For Telecommunication Services........................4,80018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,10019  For the Administration of the Registered CPA 20   Program............................................235,80021  For Refunds...........................................7,00022    Total                                          $2,303,700 23    Section 95. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated   SB4099- 14 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1from the Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund to the 2Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:3  For Personal Services.............................2,826,6004  For State Contributions to State5   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,220,7006  For State Contributions to Social Security..........219,1007  For Group Insurance...............................1,061,9008  For Contractual Services............................580,2009  For Travel............................................3,50010  For Electronic Data Processing......................349,30011  For Telecommunication Services.......................54,10012  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................9,80013  For Refunds..........................................50,00014    Total                                          $6,375,200 15    Section 100. The sum of $1,714,800, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Nursing Dedicated 17and Professional Fund to the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation for the establishment and operation of 19an Illinois Center for Nursing. 20    Section 105. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 22from the Professions Indirect Cost Fund to the Department of 23Financial and Professional Regulation:24  For Personal Services.............................8,936,200  SB4099- 15 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,795,8003  For State Contributions to Social Security..........725,1004  For Group Insurance...............................3,168,0005  For Contractual Services.........................11,155,9006  For Travel..........................................200,1007  For Commodities......................................70,9008  For Printing.........................................12,0009  For Equipment........................................42,10010  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,412,40011  For Telecommunication Services............................012  For Operation of Auto Equipment...........................013  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses14   of the Department................................4,911,80015    Total                                         $35,430,300 16    Section 110. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 18from the Cemetery Oversight Licensing and Disciplinary Fund to 19the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation:20  For Personal Services...............................864,40021  For State Contributions to State22   Employees' Retirement System.......................375,50023  For State Contributions to Social Security...........66,20024  For Group Insurance.................................316,80025  For Contractual Services............................659,700  SB4099- 16 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1  For Travel............................................2,4002  For Electronic Data Processing.......................51,9003  For Telecommunication Services........................8,0004  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................1,5005  For Administration of the Cemetery Oversight Act ....87,4006  For Refunds..........................................10,0007    Total                                          $2,443,800 8    Section 115. The sum of $1,400,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 10Financial and Professional Regulation from the Cemetery Relief 11Fund for grants to units of local government and 12not-for-profit organizations for cemeteries that are 13abandoned, neglected, or are otherwise in need of additional 14care. 15    Section 120. The sum of $319,100, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Financial 17and Professional Regulation from the Real Estate Research and 18Education Fund for costs associated with the operation of the 19Office of Real Estate Research at the University of Illinois. 20    Section 125. The sum of $7,059,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Compassionate Use 22of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation for all costs associated with   SB4099- 17 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1operational expenses of the department in relation to the 2regulation of medical cannabis. 3    Section 130. The sum of $234,300, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Appraisal 5Administration Fund to the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation for all costs associated with 7administration of the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 82002. 9    Section 135. The sum of $2,217,700, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Division of Real 11Estate General Fund to the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation for the ordinary and contingent 13expenses of the Department. 14    Section 140. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the TOMA Consumer 16Protection Fund to the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation for costs associated to individuals 18who have suffered monetary loss as a result of violations of 19the Transmitters of Money Act or the Uniform Money 20Transmission Modernization Act. 21    Section 145. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Real Estate   SB4099- 18 -OMB104 00185 AAV 10185 b1Recovery Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 2Regulation for costs associated with the Real Estate License 3Act of 2000. 4    Section 150. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Professions 6Licensure Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 7Regulation for costs associated with a new licensing system. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.